Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.380

Articles of merger—Filing.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, after a plan of merger is approved or adopted, the surviving partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, or corporation shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of merger setting forth:

(a) The plan of merger;

(b) If the approval of any partners, members, or shareholders of one or more partnerships, limited liability companies, limited partnerships, or corporations party to the merger was not required, a statement to that effect; or

(c) If the approval of any partners, members, or shareholders of one or more of the partnerships, limited liability companies, limited partnerships, or corporations party to the merger was required, a statement that the merger was duly approved by such members, partners, and shareholders pursuant to RCW 25.15.421, RCW 25.05.375, or *chapter 23B.11 RCW.

(2) If the merger involves only two or more partnerships and one or more of such partnerships has filed a statement of partnership authority with the secretary of state, the surviving partnership shall file articles of merger as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2015 c 188 s 114; 1998 c 103 s 907.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 23B.11 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 22 s 13. For later enactment, see chapter 23B.11A RCW.

Effective date—2015 c 188: See RCW 25.15.903.